Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.230

District school directors' responsibilities.

(1) It is the intent and purpose of this section to guarantee that each common school district board of directors, whether or not acting through its respective administrative staff, be held accountable for the proper operation of their district to the local community and its electorate. In accordance with the provisions of this title, as now or hereafter amended, each common school district board of directors shall be vested with the final responsibility for the setting of policies ensuring quality in the content and extent of its educational program and that such program provide students with the opportunity to achieve those skills which are generally recognized as requisite to learning.

(2) In conformance with the provisions of this title, as now or hereafter amended, it shall be the responsibility of each common school district board of directors to adopt policies to:

(a) Establish performance criteria and an evaluation process for its superintendent, classified staff, certificated personnel, including administrative staff, and for all programs constituting a part of such district's curriculum. Each district shall report annually to the superintendent of public instruction the following for each employee group listed in this subsection (2)(a): (i) Evaluation criteria and rubrics; (ii) a description of each rating; and (iii) the number of staff in each rating;

(b) Determine the final assignment of staff, certificated or classified, according to board enumerated classroom and program needs and data, based upon a plan to ensure that the assignment policy: (i) Supports the learning needs of all the students in the district; and (ii) gives specific attention to high-need schools and classrooms;

(c) Provide information to the local community and its electorate describing the school district's policies concerning hiring, assigning, terminating, and evaluating staff, including the criteria for evaluating teachers and principals;

(d) Determine the amount of instructional hours necessary for any student to acquire a quality education in such district, in not less than an amount otherwise required in RCW 28A.150.220, or rules of the state board of education;

(e) Determine the allocation of staff time, whether certificated or classified;

(f) Establish final curriculum standards consistent with law and rules of the superintendent of public instruction, relevant to the particular needs of district students or the unusual characteristics of the district, and ensuring a quality education for each student in the district; and

(g) Evaluate teaching materials, including text books, teaching aids, handouts, or other printed material, upon complaint by parents, guardians[,] or custodians of students who consider dissemination of such material to students objectionable in accordance with RCW 28A.320.235 and 28A.320.230.

[ 2024 c 316 s 4; 2010 c 235 s 201; 2006 c 263 s 201; 1994 c 245 s 9; 1991 c 61 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 106; 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 18. Formerly RCW 28A.58.758.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.

Findings—Purpose—2006 c 263: "In 2005, the legislature reconstituted the state board of education to refocus its purpose; abolished the academic achievement and accountability commission; and assigned policy and rule-making authority for educator preparation and certification to the professional educator standards board. The purpose of this act is to address the remaining statutory responsibilities of the state board of education held before 2005. The legislature finds that some duties should be retained with the reconstituted board; many duties should be transferred to other agencies or organizations, primarily but not exclusively to the superintendent of public instruction; and some duties should be repealed. This act also corrects statutes to implement fully the transfer of responsibilities authorized in 2005." [ 2006 c 263 s 1.]

Part headings not law—2006 c 263: "Part headings used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2006 c 263 s 1001.]

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: See notes following RCW 28A.150.220.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.